North Carolina statutes. Chapter 57D. North Carolina Limited Liability Company Act.
Part 2. Conversion to an LLC.

§ 57D-9-20.
Conversion.

An eligible entity other than an LLC may convert to an LLC if both of the following requirements are met:

The conversion is permitted by the law governing the organization and internal affairs of the converting entity.

The converting entity complies with the requirements of this Part and, to the extent applicable, the law governing its organization and internal affairs immediately before the conversion.

The conversion of a charitable or religious corporation to an LLC is permitted by law if the sole member of the surviving entity immediately after the conversion is a charitable or religious corporation. This subsection shall not limit the ability of an eligible entity to convert to an LLC if otherwise permitted by law.

For purposes of this section, charitable or religious corporation shall be as defined in G.S. 55A-1-40(4).

History.

2013-157, s. 2; 2016-114, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2016-114, s. 3, effective October 1, 2016, inserted the subsection (a) designation; and added subsections (b) and (c).

§ 57D-9-21.
Plan of conversion.

The converting entity must approve a written plan of conversion containing the following:

The name, type of entity, and jurisdiction whose law governs the organization and internal affairs of the converting entity immediately before the conversion.

A statement that the converting entity will deliver to the Secretary of State for filing articles of organization and conversion for the purpose of converting the eligible entity into an LLC.

The name the entity will have when the conversion becomes effective.

The terms and conditions of the conversion.

The manner and basis for converting the interests in the converting entity into ownership interests, obligations, or securities of the surviving entity or into cash or other property or any combination thereof.

The plan of conversion may contain other provisions relating to the conversion.

The provisions of the plan of conversion, other than the provisions required by subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of this section, may be made dependent on facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan of conversion if the plan of conversion provides the manner in which the facts will operate on the affected provisions. The facts may include, for example, any of the following:

Statistical or market indices, market prices of any security or group of securities, interest rates, currency exchange rates, or similar economic or financial data.

A determination or action by the converting entity or by any other person, group, or body.

The terms of, or actions taken under, an agreement to which the converting entity is a party or any other agreement or document.

The plan of conversion must be approved in accordance with the law governing the organization and internal affairs of the converting entity immediately before the conversion.

After a plan of conversion has been approved as provided in subsection (d) of this section, but before articles of conversion become effective, the plan of conversion may be amended or abandoned to the extent permitted by the law that governs the organization and internal affairs of the converting entity.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-9-22.
Filing of articles of organization and conversion by the converting entity.

After a plan of conversion has been approved by the converting entity as provided in

G.S. 57D-9-21

, the converting entity shall deliver articles of organization and conversion to the Secretary of State for filing. The articles of organization and conversion must contain (i) the information required by

G.S. 57D-2-21

and (ii) the following information:

The name, type of entity, and jurisdiction whose law governs the organization and internal affairs of the converting entity immediately before the conversion.

A statement that the articles of organization and conversion are being submitted for the purpose of converting the eligible entity into an LLC.

The name the entity will have when the conversion becomes effective.

The mailing address of the converting entity immediately before the conversion and, if different, the mailing address it will have when the conversion becomes effective.

A statement that a plan of conversion has been approved by the converting entity as required by law.

If the plan of conversion is abandoned after the articles of organization and conversion have been delivered to the Secretary of State but before the articles of organization and conversion become effective, the converting entity must deliver to the Secretary of State for filing prior to the time the articles of organization and conversion become effective an amendment withdrawing such articles.

Certificates of conversion must be registered as provided in

G.S. 47-18.1

.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-9-23.
Effective date; effects of conversion.

The conversion takes effect when the articles of organization and conversion of the converting entity filed by the Secretary of State become effective, at which time the following shall occur:

The converting entity ceases its prior form of organization and continues in existence as the surviving entity.

The title to all real estate and other property owned by the converting entity continues to be vested in the surviving entity without reversion or impairment.

All liabilities of the converting entity continue as liabilities of the surviving entity.

A proceeding pending by or against the converting entity remains pending by or against the surviving entity as if the conversion did not occur.

The equity or beneficial ownership interests in the converting entity that are to be converted into ownership interests, obligations, or securities of the surviving entity or into the right to receive cash or other property are thereupon so converted, and the former holders of equity or beneficial ownership interests in the converting entity are entitled only to the rights provided, including by reference, in the plan of conversion and the surviving entity’s operating agreement.

The conversion does not affect the liability or absence of liability of an equity or beneficial owner of the converting entity for any acts, omissions, or obligations of the converting entity made or incurred prior to the effectiveness of the conversion. A conversion under this Part does not constitute a dissolution or termination of the converting entity.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§§ 57D-9-24 through 57D-9-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.